Utah statutes.
31A-29-112.   Medicaid recipients.
(1)  If authorized by federal statutes or rules, an individual receiving
Medicaid benefits may continue to receive those benefits while satisfying the
preexisting condition requirements established by Section 31A-29-113 and the
terms of the pool policy issued under this chapter.
(2)  If allowed by federal statute, federal regulation, state statute, or
rule, the Department of Health shall allocate premiums paid to the pool by an
individual receiving Medicaid benefits to that individual's spenddown for
purposes of the Medicaid program.
(3) (a)  If an individual continues to receive Medicaid benefits after the
requirements for a preexisting condition are satisfied, the pool administrator
may not issue a pool policy or allow that individual to receive any benefit
from the pool.
(b)  If an individual continues to receive Medicaid benefits when the
requirements for a preexisting condition are satisfied, the pool administrator
shall give any premiums collected by it during the preexisting conditions
period to the Medicaid program.
(4) (a)  If an enrollee becomes eligible to receive Medicaid benefits, the
enrollee's coverage by the pool terminates as of the effective date of
Medicaid coverage.
(b)  The pool administrator shall:
(i)  include a provision in the pool policy requiring an enrollee to provide
written notice to the pool administration if the enrollee becomes covered by
Medicaid; and
(ii)  terminate an enrollee's coverage by the pool as of the effective date of
the enrollee's Medicaid coverage when the pool administrator becomes aware
that the enrollee is covered by Medicaid.
(5)  If an individual terminates coverage under Medicaid and applies for
coverage under a pool policy within 45 days after terminating the coverage,
the individual may begin coverage under a pool policy as of the date that
Medicaid coverage terminated, if an individual meets the other eligibility
requirements of the chapter and pays the required premium.
(6)  Notwithstanding Subsections 31A-29-111(1)(b)(i) and (2)(b)(i), an
individual is eligible for coverage by the pool if the requirements of Section
31A-29-111 are met and if:
(a)  the individual's eligibility for Medicaid requires a spenddown, as
defined by rule, that exceeds the premium for a pool policy; or
(b)  the individual is eligible for the Primary Care Network program
administered by the Department of Health.
